Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 2361 (3) 91 je/ns/md H.F. 2361 DIVISION I 1 SHORT TITLE 2 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 3 cited as the âIncreasing Civic Proficiency in Higher Education 4 Actâ. 5 DIVISION II 6 REGENTS INSTITUTIONS ââ GENERAL EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS AND 7 CORE CURRICULA ââ COURSES ON AMERICAN HISTORY AND AMERICAN 8 GOVERNMENT 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 262.100 General education requirements 10 and core curricula ââ courses on American history and American 11 government. 12 1. The state board of regents shall require each institution 13 of higher education governed by the board to establish as 14 a requirement for the completion of any general education 15 requirements or core curricula that an undergraduate student 16 complete an introductory survey course in American history 17 and an introductory survey course in American government. An 18 institution shall assign a value of at least three semester 19 hours of credit to each course. A course required by this 20 section shall be a comprehensive survey of all American history 21 and American government. 22 2. A course required by this section shall fulfill the 23 general education or core curriculum requirement for social 24 sciences or humanities, as designated by the institution, that 25 a student is required to complete as a condition of graduation. 26 3. An institution shall provide equivalent credit toward 27 the courses required by this section to a student transferring 28 to the institution for previous coursework completed by the 29 student that is substantially similar to a required course. 30 4. This section does not apply to a student completing a 31 degree program designated by an institution as a degree program 32 of three years or less in duration. 33 5. Annually, the center for intellectual freedom at the 34 state university of Iowa, the center for cyclone civics at the 35 -1- HF 2361 (3) 91 je/ns/md 1/ 3 H.F. 2361 Iowa state university of science and technology, and the center 1 for civic education at the university of northern Iowa shall 2 designate courses at their respective institutions that satisfy 3 the requirements of this section. 4 Sec. 3. Section 263C.3, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 5 by striking the subsection. 6 Sec. 4. REVIEW OF GENERAL EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS AND CORE 7 CURRICULA. By the semester beginning fall 2028, the board of 8 regents shall conduct a review of all undergraduate general 9 education requirements and core curricula at institutions of 10 higher education governed by the board. 11 Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. The section of this Act enacting 12 section 262.100 applies to undergraduate students beginning 13 enrollment at institutions of higher education governed by the 14 board of regents in academic years beginning on or after July 15 1, 2028. 16 DIVISION III 17 LECTURE AND DEBATE SERIES 18 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 262.105 Lecture and debate series. 19 By December 31, 2026, the center for intellectual freedom at 20 the state university of Iowa, the center for cyclone civics at 21 the Iowa state university of science and technology, and the 22 center for civic education at the university of northern Iowa 23 shall each establish an ongoing lecture and debate series. The 24 series must promote civil dialogue and debate on the issues 25 most important to the American republic. 26 DIVISION IV 27 CENTERS ââ ANNUAL REPORTS 28 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 266.8 Annual report ââ center for 29 cyclone civics. 30 The director of the center for cyclone civics at the Iowa 31 state university of science and technology shall submit an 32 annual report to the governor, the general assembly, and the 33 state board of regents by December 31. The report must provide 34 a full account of the centerâs achievements and must identify 35 -2- HF 2361 (3) 91 je/ns/md 2/ 3 H.F. 2361 any opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development 1 of the center. 2 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 268.6 Annual report ââ center for 3 civic education. 4 The director of the center for civic education at the 5 university of northern Iowa shall submit an annual report 6 to the governor, the general assembly, and the state board 7 of regents by December 31. The report must provide a full 8 account of the centerâs achievements and must identify any 9 opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of 10 the center. 11 -3- HF 2361 (3) 91 je/ns/md 3/ 3